hunspell/tr/tr.aff
FLAG num
SFX 8116 N 1
SFX 8116 0 işilmezliğinden .
SFX 8117 N 1
SFX 8117 0 ulmamasından .
SFX 8118 N 1
SFX 8118 0 lanılmalı .
SFX 8119 N 1
SFX 8119 0 dırılacağını .
SFX 8120 N 1
SFX 8120 0 nsa .
SFX 8121 N 1
SFX 8121 0 sünde .
SFX 8122 N 1
SFX 8122 0 lerindeydi .
SFX 8123 N 1
SFX 8123 0 uşun .
SFX 8124 N 1
SFX 8124 0 tmayanların .
SFX 8125 N 1
SFX 8125 0 uşum .
SFX 8126 N 1
SFX 8126 0 lenmemesi .
SFX 8127 N 1
SFX 8127 0 sızlıkları .
SFX 8128 N 1
SFX 8128 0 leştirenlerin .
SFX 8129 N 1
SFX 8129 0 acaktınız .
SFX 8130 N 1
SFX 8130 0 lüğündendir .
SFX 8131 N 1
SFX 8131 0 lerimde .
SFX 8132 N 1
SFX 8132 0 leyememişlerdir .
SFX 8133 N 1
SFX 8133 0 uluklarına .
SFX 8134 N 1
SFX 8134 0 ulmayacak .
SFX 8135 N 1
SFX 8135 0 'ninkiyle .
SFX 8136 N 1
SFX 8136 0 landırırlar .
SFX 8137 N 1
SFX 8137 0 menizdir .
SFX 8138 N 1
SFX 8138 0 durulmadığını .
SFX 8139 N 1
SFX 8139 0 eceğimizin .
SFX 8140 N 1
SFX 8140 0 namadığından .
SFX 8141 N 1
SFX 8141 0 uştu .
SFX 8142 N 1
SFX 8142 0 laşılmazsa .
SFX 8143 N 1
SFX 8143 0 lenemeyeceğinden .
SFX 8144 N 1
SFX 8144 0 memeliyim .
SFX 8145 N 1
SFX 8145 0 ttığımda .
SFX 8146 N 1
SFX 8146 0 leşimine .
SFX 8147 N 1
SFX 8147 0 ışmayı .
SFX 8148 N 1
SFX 8148 0 lendirilmişti .
SFX 8149 N 1
SFX 8149 0 niş .
SFX 8150 N 1
SFX 8150 0 leşimini .
SFX 8151 N 1
SFX 8151 0 tildiğini .
SFX 8152 N 1
SFX 8152 0 memeliyiz .
SFX 8153 N 1
SFX 8153 0 ştırdıklarında .
SFX 8154 N 1
SFX 8154 0 mezliğiyle .
SFX 8155 N 1
SFX 8155 0 uşla .
SFX 8156 N 1
SFX 8156 0 meyeceğiniz .
SFX 8157 N 1
SFX 8157 0 ılabileceğinden .
SFX 8158 N 1
SFX 8158 0 ınmadığını .
SFX 8159 N 1
SFX 8159 0 laşmalarıdır .
SFX 8160 N 1
SFX 8160 0 meyeceğinin .
SFX 8161 N 1
SFX 8161 0 ülmem .
SFX 8162 N 1
SFX 8162 0 leştirmelere .
SFX 8163 N 1
SFX 8163 0 tırılıp .
SFX 8164 N 1
SFX 8164 0 ındaysak .
SFX 8165 N 1
SFX 8165 0 leştirmeleri .
SFX 8166 N 1
SFX 8166 0 ülmek .
SFX 8167 N 1
SFX 8167 0 tırılır .
SFX 8168 N 1
SFX 8168 0 ladığımı .
SFX 8169 N 1
SFX 8169 0 laşmanızdır .
SFX 8170 N 1
SFX 8170 0 tırmalarındaki .
SFX 8171 N 1
SFX 8171 0 lerdi .
SFX 8172 N 1
SFX 8172 0 lamamızda .
SFX 8173 N 1
SFX 8173 0 uyoruz .
SFX 8174 N 1
SFX 8174 0 lerde .
SFX 8175 N 1
SFX 8175 0 ülmez .
SFX 8176 N 1
SFX 8176 0 tacaktım .
SFX 8177 N 1
SFX 8177 0 işimizdir .
SFX 8178 N 1
SFX 8178 0 tmişim .
SFX 8179 N 1
SFX 8179 0 ılırlığına .
SFX 8180 N 1
SFX 8180 0 ndiğimizi .
SFX 8181 N 1
SFX 8181 0 tacaktır .
SFX 8182 N 1
SFX 8182 0 indeydiler .
SFX 8183 N 1
SFX 8183 0 direcektir .
SFX 8184 N 1
SFX 8184 0 imdedir .
SFX 8185 N 1
SFX 8185 0 uyorum .
SFX 8186 N 1
SFX 8186 0 ındaysan .
SFX 8187 N 1
SFX 8187 0 sindendir .
SFX 8188 N 1
SFX 8188 0 lanmadıkça .
SFX 8189 N 1
SFX 8189 0 lenirsek .
SFX 8190 N 1
SFX 8190 0 tıldığın .
SFX 8191 N 1
SFX 8191 0 lamalardaki .
SFX 8192 N 1
SFX 8192 0 tacaktık .
SFX 8193 N 1
SFX 8193 0 ladığını .
SFX 8194 N 1
SFX 8194 0 leştirilmemiş .
SFX 8195 N 1
SFX 8195 0 şmelerinde .
SFX 8196 N 1
SFX 8196 0 yeceklerinin .
SFX 8197 N 1
SFX 8197 0 asıdır .
SFX 8198 N 1
SFX 8198 0 ilmezliğiyle .
SFX 8199 N 1
SFX 8199 0 rlikleri .
SFX 8200 N 1
SFX 8200 0 çılığa .
SFX 8201 N 1
SFX 8201 0 yabilirlerse .
SFX 8202 N 1
SFX 8202 0 diremediğini .
SFX 8203 N 1
SFX 8203 0 ıştıramadıklarından .
SFX 8204 N 1
SFX 8204 0 ışsa .
SFX 8205 N 1
SFX 8205 0 tamadığından .
SFX 8206 N 1
SFX 8206 0 tmişiz .
SFX 8207 N 1
SFX 8207 0 imcilerinden .
SFX 8208 N 1
SFX 8208 0 nmanıza .
SFX 8209 N 1
SFX 8209 0 cuydu .
SFX 8210 N 1
SFX 8210 0 memişimdir .
SFX 8211 N 1
SFX 8211 0 ışlı .
SFX 8212 N 1
SFX 8212 0 yamazdık .
SFX 8213 N 1
SFX 8213 0 ındakiler .
SFX 8214 N 1
SFX 8214 0 diremediğine .
SFX 8215 N 1
SFX 8215 0 yamazdım .
SFX 8216 N 1
SFX 8216 0 nme .
SFX 8217 N 1
SFX 8217 0 dirin .
SFX 8218 N 1
SFX 8218 0 uyorsa .
SFX 8219 N 1
SFX 8219 0 landırılmıştı .
SFX 8220 N 1
SFX 8220 0 nma .
SFX 8221 N 1
SFX 8221 0 dirir .
SFX 8222 N 1
SFX 8222 0 dirip .
SFX 8223 N 1
SFX 8223 0 lılık .
SFX 8224 N 1
SFX 8224 0 tabilirseniz .
SFX 8225 N 1
SFX 8225 0 seydiler .
SFX 8226 N 1
SFX 8226 0 mekteyken .
SFX 8227 N 1
SFX 8227 0 mamalıydı .
SFX 8228 N 1
SFX 8228 0 lemelerine .
SFX 8229 N 1
SFX 8229 0 ışta .
SFX 8230 N 1
SFX 8230 0 lerindeydiler .
SFX 8231 N 1
SFX 8231 0 lemelerini .
SFX 8232 N 1
SFX 8232 0 emeyip .
SFX 8233 N 1
SFX 8233 0 latılışı .
SFX 8234 N 1
SFX 8234 0 ememesiyle .
SFX 8235 N 1
SFX 8235 0 tmazken .
SFX 8236 N 1
SFX 8236 0 emeyiz .
SFX 8237 N 1
SFX 8237 0 lerce .
SFX 8238 N 1
SFX 8238 0 yamayınca .
SFX 8239 N 1
SFX 8239 0 ışmalı .
SFX 8240 N 1
SFX 8240 0 dırılabiliyor .
SFX 8241 N 1
SFX 8241 0 ilmelerinden .
SFX 8242 N 1
SFX 8242 0 layamadığınız .
SFX 8243 N 1
SFX 8243 0 memeliydi .
SFX 8244 N 1
SFX 8244 0 sındakilere .
SFX 8245 N 1
SFX 8245 0 memişlerin .
SFX 8246 N 1
SFX 8246 0 yanlarını .
SFX 8247 N 1
SFX 8247 0 lerindeyiz .
SFX 8248 N 1
SFX 8248 0 cımda .
SFX 8249 N 1
SFX 8249 0 sındakileri .
SFX 8250 N 1
SFX 8250 0 ılamayacaklarının .
SFX 8251 N 1
SFX 8251 0 nla .
SFX 8252 N 1
SFX 8252 0 leşebilecekleri .
SFX 8253 N 1
SFX 8253 0 nle .
SFX 8254 N 1
SFX 8254 0 ştırılmadığı .
SFX 8255 N 1
SFX 8255 0 durmadıklarını .
SFX 8256 N 1
SFX 8256 0 tmamı .
SFX 8257 N 1
SFX 8257 0 tığı .
SFX 8258 N 1
SFX 8258 0 'idir .
SFX 8259 N 1
SFX 8259 0 leyemiyorduk .
SFX 8260 N 1
SFX 8260 0 dırırsın .
SFX 8261 N 1
SFX 8261 0 şmazlardı .
SFX 8262 N 1
SFX 8262 0 mezsiniz .
SFX 8263 N 1
SFX 8263 0 ündeler .
SFX 8264 N 1
SFX 8264 0 dirilebileceği .
SFX 8265 N 1
SFX 8265 0 tırabilecekler .
SFX 8266 N 1
SFX 8266 0 tmasa .
SFX 8267 N 1
SFX 8267 0 latılıyor .
SFX 8268 N 1
SFX 8268 0 sına .
SFX 8269 N 1
SFX 8269 0 şmamız .
SFX 8270 N 1
SFX 8270 0 nmesiydi .
SFX 8271 N 1
SFX 8271 0 cuyla .
SFX 8272 N 1
SFX 8272 0 tmalı .
SFX 8273 N 1
SFX 8273 0 lerin .
SFX 8274 N 1
SFX 8274 0 lerim .
SFX 8275 N 1
SFX 8275 0 'taydık .
SFX 8276 N 1
SFX 8276 0 amayacakmış .
SFX 8277 N 1
SFX 8277 0 ulmamak .
SFX 8278 N 1
SFX 8278 0 leştirdiğinden .
SFX 8279 N 1
SFX 8279 0 latmadan .
SFX 8280 N 1
SFX 8280 0 ışmaya .
SFX 8281 N 1
SFX 8281 0 madıklarıyla .
SFX 8282 N 1
SFX 8282 0 dirdiğine .
SFX 8283 N 1
SFX 8283 0 masıdır .
SFX 8284 N 1
SFX 8284 0 ştıramadıkları .
SFX 8285 N 1
SFX 8285 0 mişte .
SFX 8286 N 1
SFX 8286 0 şabilmiş .
SFX 8287 N 1
SFX 8287 0 dirdiğini .
SFX 8288 N 1
SFX 8288 0 mezdim .
SFX 8289 N 1
SFX 8289 0 mezdin .
SFX 8290 N 1
SFX 8290 0 mezdik .
SFX 8291 N 1
SFX 8291 0 ilemeyeceklerine .
SFX 8292 N 1
SFX 8292 0 iverdim .
SFX 8293 N 1
SFX 8293 0 mezdir .
SFX 8294 N 1
SFX 8294 0 iverdik .
SFX 8295 N 1
SFX 8295 0 sizliğinizi .
SFX 8296 N 1
SFX 8296 0 ilemeyeceklerini .
SFX 8297 N 1
SFX 8297 0 tmeyeyim .
SFX 8298 N 1
SFX 8298 0 mişti .
SFX 8299 N 1
SFX 8299 0 tmamışlar .
SFX 8300 N 1
SFX 8300 0 lerimle .
SFX 8301 N 1
SFX 8301 0 lanmayabileceği .
SFX 8302 N 1
SFX 8302 0 şacaktır .
SFX 8303 N 1
SFX 8303 0 leşmiştim .
SFX 8304 N 1
SFX 8304 0 lenilerek .
SFX 8305 N 1
SFX 8305 0 ımcılığı .
SFX 8306 N 1
SFX 8306 0 leşmiştik .
SFX 8307 N 1
SFX 8307 0 ndı .
SFX 8308 N 1
SFX 8308 0 lanmamışlar .
SFX 8309 N 1
SFX 8309 0 amayabilir .
SFX 8310 N 1
SFX 8310 0 latmada .
SFX 8311 N 1
SFX 8311 0 layıcısının .
SFX 8312 N 1
SFX 8312 0 tmamalarını .
SFX 8313 N 1
SFX 8313 0 şmamalarını .
SFX 8314 N 1
SFX 8314 0 mişse .
SFX 8315 N 1
SFX 8315 0 lamasaydım .
SFX 8316 N 1
SFX 8316 0 lamasaydık .
SFX 8317 N 1
SFX 8317 0 ndü .
SFX 8318 N 1
SFX 8318 0 ıvermek .
SFX 8319 N 1
SFX 8319 0 layamıyordu .
SFX 8320 N 1
SFX 8320 0 uşma .
SFX 8321 N 1
SFX 8321 0 lendiğimizi .
SFX 8322 N 1
SFX 8322 0 ştirildiği .
SFX 8323 N 1
SFX 8323 0 lenimlerinde .
SFX 8324 N 1
SFX 8324 0 ılabildiğine .
SFX 8325 N 1
SFX 8325 0 niz .
SFX 8326 N 1
SFX 8326 0 memişler .
SFX 8327 N 1
SFX 8327 0 emeyenlerden .
SFX 8328 N 1
SFX 8328 0 larınında .
SFX 8329 N 1
SFX 8329 0 luklardır .
SFX 8330 N 1
SFX 8330 0 sısın .
SFX 8331 N 1
SFX 8331 0 abileceğinde .
SFX 8332 N 1
SFX 8332 0 emeyen .
SFX 8333 N 1
SFX 8333 0 şılmalıdır .
SFX 8334 N 1
SFX 8334 0 nir .
SFX 8335 N 1
SFX 8335 0 yacakmış .
SFX 8336 N 1
SFX 8336 0 nip .
SFX 8337 N 1
SFX 8337 0 miyordur .
SFX 8338 N 1
SFX 8338 0 nim .
SFX 8339 N 1
SFX 8339 0 ılabildiğini .
SFX 8340 N 1
SFX 8340 0 nin .
SFX 8341 N 1
SFX 8341 0 nılarak .
SFX 8342 N 1
SFX 8342 0 dirme .
SFX 8343 N 1
SFX 8343 0 layamadığının .
SFX 8344 N 1
SFX 8344 0 layabildiler .
SFX 8345 N 1
SFX 8345 0 luğunda .
SFX 8346 N 1
SFX 8346 0 duranın .
SFX 8347 N 1
SFX 8347 0 ilseydi .
SFX 8348 N 1
SFX 8348 0 indekinden .
SFX 8349 N 1
SFX 8349 0 yıverdiği .
SFX 8350 N 1
SFX 8350 0 lananlar .
SFX 8351 N 1
SFX 8351 0 düreceğini .
SFX 8352 N 1
SFX 8352 0 liğinizdir .
SFX 8353 N 1
SFX 8353 0 düreceğine .
SFX 8354 N 1
SFX 8354 0 ulmakla .
SFX 8355 N 1
SFX 8355 0 akaldığı .
SFX 8356 N 1
SFX 8356 0 ndirenler .
SFX 8357 N 1
SFX 8357 0 lendirmeden .
SFX 8358 N 1
SFX 8358 0 leneceğinden .
SFX 8359 N 1
SFX 8359 0 malıymış .
SFX 8360 N 1
SFX 8360 0 ndirilmelerini .
SFX 8361 N 1
SFX 8361 0 düğünde .
SFX 8362 N 1
SFX 8362 0 nmeyince .
SFX 8363 N 1
SFX 8363 0 tırmamıştır .
SFX 8364 N 1
SFX 8364 0 ulacağı .
SFX 8365 N 1
SFX 8365 0 ılabilmek .
SFX 8366 N 1
SFX 8366 0 laştırıyorsunuz .
SFX 8367 N 1
SFX 8367 0 iştiremediği .
SFX 8368 N 1
SFX 8368 0 lıklardan .
SFX 8369 N 1
SFX 8369 0 leşeceğim .
SFX 8370 N 1
SFX 8370 0 ukluklarından .
SFX 8371 N 1
SFX 8371 0 nileceğini .
SFX 8372 N 1
SFX 8372 0 çilerle .
SFX 8373 N 1
SFX 8373 0 nileceğine .
SFX 8374 N 1
SFX 8374 0 yamamalarını .
SFX 8375 N 1
SFX 8375 0 emediler .
SFX 8376 N 1
SFX 8376 0 nıldığı .
SFX 8377 N 1
SFX 8377 0 leşeceğiz .
SFX 8378 N 1
SFX 8378 0 lülüğünü .
SFX 8379 N 1
SFX 8379 0 suzlukları .
SFX 8380 N 1
SFX 8380 0 durduğu .
SFX 8381 N 1
SFX 8381 0 latana .
SFX 8382 N 1
SFX 8382 0 leşmediğinden .
SFX 8383 N 1
SFX 8383 0 laşmasındaki .
SFX 8384 N 1
SFX 8384 0 dirtmiş .
SFX 8385 N 1
SFX 8385 0 macının .
SFX 8386 N 1
SFX 8386 0 sallık .
SFX 8387 N 1
SFX 8387 0 süymüş .
SFX 8388 N 1
SFX 8388 0 latmasından .
SFX 8389 N 1
SFX 8389 0 şmayı .
SFX 8390 N 1
SFX 8390 0 imlinin .
SFX 8391 N 1
SFX 8391 0 letemediklerini .
SFX 8392 N 1
SFX 8392 0 lenebilirsiniz .
SFX 8393 N 1
SFX 8393 0 tabileceğine .
SFX 8394 N 1
SFX 8394 0 leyemezsiniz .
SFX 8395 N 1
SFX 8395 0 tabileceğini .
SFX 8396 N 1
SFX 8396 0 üşüydü .
SFX 8397 N 1
SFX 8397 0 yişlerinden .
SFX 8398 N 1
SFX 8398 0 lemediklerinin .
SFX 8399 N 1
SFX 8399 0 çıkların .
SFX 8400 N 1
SFX 8400 0 ndirilmesinin .
SFX 8401 N 1
SFX 8401 0 tımında .
SFX 8402 N 1
SFX 8402 0 tecektir .
SFX 8403 N 1
SFX 8403 0 nmemesi .
SFX 8404 N 1
SFX 8404 0 ulmalıydı .
SFX 8405 N 1
SFX 8405 0 lenemiyorlar .
SFX 8406 N 1
SFX 8406 0 'unda .
SFX 8407 N 1
SFX 8407 0 memesidir .
SFX 8408 N 1
SFX 8408 0 lanmanız .
SFX 8409 N 1
SFX 8409 0 amamakta .
SFX 8410 N 1
SFX 8410 0 üşüne .
SFX 8411 N 1
SFX 8411 0 nemedi .
SFX 8412 N 1
SFX 8412 0 lenmesindeki .
SFX 8413 N 1
SFX 8413 0 dırayım .
SFX 8414 N 1
SFX 8414 0 ıklardan .
SFX 8415 N 1
SFX 8415 0 suzluklara .
SFX 8416 N 1
SFX 8416 0 latamayacaklarını .
SFX 8417 N 1
SFX 8417 0 leştirdiğinde .
SFX 8418 N 1
SFX 8418 0 macılığında .
SFX 8419 N 1
SFX 8419 0 ştirebileceğini .
SFX 8420 N 1
SFX 8420 0 nilebileceği .
SFX 8421 N 1
SFX 8421 0 üldükten .
SFX 8422 N 1
SFX 8422 0 ndiğidir .
SFX 8423 N 1
SFX 8423 0 laştıramayacağını .
SFX 8424 N 1
SFX 8424 0 dıramadığı .
SFX 8425 N 1
SFX 8425 0 nmamışlar .
SFX 8426 N 1
SFX 8426 0 nabileceğine .
SFX 8427 N 1
SFX 8427 0 yebilmesinin .
SFX 8428 N 1
SFX 8428 0 sizdirler .
SFX 8429 N 1
SFX 8429 0 leştirilebilmesi .
SFX 8430 N 1
SFX 8430 0 nabileceğini .
SFX 8431 N 1
SFX 8431 0 tılsa .
SFX 8432 N 1
SFX 8432 0 üşüyle .
SFX 8433 N 1
SFX 8433 0 şeceği .
SFX 8434 N 1
SFX 8434 0 lukların .
SFX 8435 N 1
SFX 8435 0 yamamalarına .
SFX 8436 N 1
SFX 8436 0 iği .
SFX 8437 N 1
SFX 8437 0 luklarım .
SFX 8438 N 1
SFX 8438 0 leştiremeyenlerin .
SFX 8439 N 1
SFX 8439 0 leşinceye .
SFX 8440 N 1
SFX 8440 0 lularından .
SFX 8441 N 1
SFX 8441 0 uşturduğundan .
SFX 8442 N 1
SFX 8442 0 ndirirken .
SFX 8443 N 1
SFX 8443 0 turulamadığına .
SFX 8444 N 1
SFX 8444 0 lerininkini .
SFX 8445 N 1
SFX 8445 0 amayacağız .
SFX 8446 N 1
SFX 8446 0 işimizden .
SFX 8447 N 1
SFX 8447 0 leştiremeyişi .
SFX 8448 N 1
SFX 8448 0 lininse .
